Washington statutes.
RCW 4.100.070

Provision of information—Statute of limitations.

(1) On or after July 28, 2013, when a court grants judicial relief, such as reversal and vacation of a person's conviction, consistent with the criteria established in RCW 4.100.040, the court must provide to the claimant a copy of RCW 4.100.020 through 4.100.090, 28B.15.395, and 72.09.750 at the time the relief is granted.

(2) The clemency and pardons board or the indeterminate sentence review board, whichever is applicable, upon issuance of a pardon by the governor on grounds consistent with innocence on or after July 28, 2013, must provide a copy of RCW 4.100.020 through 4.100.090, 28B.15.395, and 72.09.750 to the individual pardoned.

(3) If an individual entitled to receive the information required under this section shows that he or she was not provided with the information, he or she has an additional twelve months, beyond the statute of limitations under RCW 4.100.090, to bring a claim under this chapter.

[ 2013 c 175 s 7.]